src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-1A-vaeaell_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - vääll u-stem dlo: # Noun - full paradigm
     vääll+N+Sg+Nom: vääll
     vääll+N+Sg+Gen: vääl
     vääll+N+Sg+Acc: vääl
     vääll+N+Sg+Ill: vallu
     vääll+N+Sg+Loc: väälast
     vääll+N+Sg+Com: väälain
     vääll+N+Ess: väällan
     vääll+N+Par: väällad
     vääll+N+Sg+Abe: [väältää, väältaa]
     vääll+N+Pl+Nom: vääl
     vääll+N+Pl+Gen: väälai
     vääll+N+Pl+Acc: väälaid
     vääll+N+Pl+Ill: väälaid
     vääll+N+Pl+Loc: väälain
     vääll+N+Pl+Com: väälaivuiʹm
     vääll+N+Pl+Abe: [väälaitää, väälaitaa]
     
     vääll+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: väällam
     vääll+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: väällad
     vääll+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: väällas
     vääll+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: väällam
     vääll+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: väällad
     vääll+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: väällaz
     
     vääll+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: väällan
     vääll+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: väälad
     vääll+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: väälas
     vääll+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: väällan
     vääll+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: väälad
     vääll+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: väälaz
     
     vääll+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: väällan
     vääll+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: väälad
     vääll+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: väälas
     vääll+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: väällan
     vääll+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: väälad
     vääll+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: väälaz
     
     vääll+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: vällsan
     vääll+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: vällsad
     vääll+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: vällses
     vääll+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: vällseem
     vääll+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: vällseed
     vääll+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: vällseez
     
     vääll+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: välstan
     vääll+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: välstad
     vääll+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: välstes
     vääll+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: välsteen
     vääll+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: välsteed
     vääll+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: välsteez

     vääll+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: väälainan
     vääll+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: väälainad
     vääll+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: väälaines
     vääll+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: väälainen
     vääll+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: väälained
     vääll+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: väälainez
     
     vääll+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: väällantää
     vääll+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: vääladtää
     vääll+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: väälastää
     vääll+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: väällantää
     vääll+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: vääladtää
     vääll+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: väälaztää
     
     vääll+N+Ess+PxSg1: vällnan
     vääll+N+Ess+PxSg2: vällnad
     vääll+N+Ess+PxSg3: vällnes
     vääll+N+Ess+PxPl1: vällneen
     vääll+N+Ess+PxPl2: vällneed
     vääll+N+Ess+PxPl3: vällneez
#     
     vääll+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: väällan
     vääll+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: väälad
     vääll+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: väälas
     vääll+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: väällan
     vääll+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: väälad
     vääll+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: väälaz
     
     vääll+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: väälään
     vääll+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: väälääd
     vääll+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: väälees
     vääll+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: vääleen
     vääll+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: vääleed
     vääll+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: vääleez
     
     vääll+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: väälään
     vääll+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: väälääd
     vääll+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: väälees
     vääll+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: vääleen
     vääll+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: vääleed
     vääll+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: vääleez
     
     vääll+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: väälään
     vääll+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: väälääd
     vääll+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: väälees
     vääll+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: vääleen
     vääll+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: vääleed
     vääll+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: vääleez
     
     vääll+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: väälainan
     vääll+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: väälainad
     vääll+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: väälaines
     vääll+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: väälainen
     vääll+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: väälained
     vääll+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: väälainez
     
     vääll+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: vääläänvuiʹm
     vääll+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: vääläädvuiʹm
     vääll+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: vääleesvuiʹm
     vääll+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: vääleenvuiʹm
     vääll+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: vääleedvuiʹm
     vääll+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: vääleezvuiʹm
     
     vääll+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: väälääntää
     vääll+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: vääläädtää
     vääll+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: vääleestää
     vääll+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: vääleentää
     vääll+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: vääleedtää
     vääll+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: vääleeztää
     
#
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [väälaž, vaaluž]
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen: vaalu
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc: vaaluž
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: [väällže, vaallže]
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: vaalust
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: vaalun
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe: vaalutää
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ess: [väälžen, vaalžen]
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Par: [väälžed, vaalžed]

     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: vaalu
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen: vaalui
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc: vaaluid
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill: vaaluid
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc: vaaluin
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com: vaaluivuiʹm
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe: vaaluitää

     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: väälžam
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: väälžad
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: väälžes
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: väälžeem
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: väälžeed
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: väälžeez
     
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: väälžan
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: väälžad
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: väälžes
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: väälžeen
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: väälžeed
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: väälžeez
     
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: väälžan
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: väälžad
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: väälžes
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: väälžeen
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: väälžeed
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: väälžeez

     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: väälžasan
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: väälžasad
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: väälžasas
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: väälžeʹsen
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: väälžeʹsed
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: väälžeʹsez
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: valstan
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: valstad
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: valstes
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: valsteen
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: valsteed
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: valsteez
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: vaalinan
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: vaalinad
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: vaalines
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: vaalineen
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: vaalineed
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: vaalineez
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: väälžantää
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: väälžadtää
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: väälžestää
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: väälžeentää
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: väälžeedtää
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: väälžeeztää

#     
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: väälžan
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: väälžad
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: väälžes
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: väälžeen
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: väälžeed
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: väälžeez
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: vaalään
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: vaalääd
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: vaalees
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: vaaleen
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: vaaleed
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: vaaleez
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: vaalään
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: vaalääd
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: vaalees
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: vaaleen
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: vaaleed
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: vaaleez
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: vaalään
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: vaalääd
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: vaalees
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: vaaleen
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: vaaleed
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: vaaleez
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: vaaluinan
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: vaaluinad
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: vaaluines
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: vaaluineen
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: vaaluineed
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: vaaluineez
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: vaaläänvuiʹm
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: vaaläädvuiʹm
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: vaaleesvuiʹm
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: vaaleenvuiʹm
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: vaaleedvuiʹm
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: vaaleezvuiʹm
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: vaalääntää
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: vaaläädtää
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: vaaleestää
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: vaaleentää
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: vaaleedtää
     vääll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: vaaleeztää
